apertium-lif.lif.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Limbu

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular
# <du>     # Dual

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Number
Punctuation
Nouns
Verbs
Adjectives
Determiners-Words
Conjunctions
Adverbs
Question-Particles
CaseMarker
Pronoun-Words
DemonstrativePrns
DefinitePrns
IndefinitePrns
InterrogativePrns
ReflexivePrns
Prepositions
Complementizer
Concession
Interjection
TopicMarker
Evidentiality
Postpositions
NumeralWords
Units [ <num>: ]
Ordinals [ <ord>: ]
EmphMarker

PATTERN Prepositions
PossessivePrn?(1) Prepos-Stems PossessivePrn?(2)

PATTERN NumeralWords
NumeralStems
NumeralStems ( [ +:> ]Adverbs)
NumeralStems Collectivity

PATTERN Postpositions
PossessivePrn?(1) Postpos-Stems PossessivePrn?(2) Cases?

PATTERN Interjection
Ij-Stem [ <ij>: ] ( [ +:> ]Question-Particles)?

PATTERN Adverbs
AdverbStem [ <adv>: ] ( [ +:> ]Adverbs2) [ <adv>: ] ( [ +:> ]Complementizer)?
AdverbStem [ <adv>: ] ( [ +:> ]Complementizer)?
AdverbStem [ <adv>: ] Concession
AdverbStem [ <adv>: ] Cases? Nominalizer
AdverbStem Ergation

PATTERN Determiners-Words
(Adverbs [ +:> ] )? Determiners [ <det>: ] Comparative?
Determiners Ergation

PATTERN Pronoun-Words
Pronouns PossessiveSuff? ( [ +:> ]Adverbs)?
Pronouns Cases?

PATTERN DemonstrativePrns
DemPrn Plurals? Cases?

PATTERN DefinitePrns
DefPrn

PATTERN InterrogativePrns
IntPrn Nominalizer?

PATTERN IndefinitePrns
IndPrn

PATTERN ReflexivePrns
ReflPrn

PATTERN Nouns
(Adjectives [ +:> ] )? Voice?(1) PossessivePrn?(1) Noun-Stems Plurals Voice?(2) PossessivePrn?(2) Cases?
Noun-Stems Nominalizer Plurals ( [ +:> ] Adjectives)
Noun-Stems Nominalizer Imperious? Cases? ( [ +:> ] Adverbs)
(Adjectives [ +:> ] )? Noun-Stems Nominalizer
Noun-Stems Attr
Noun-Stems Cases Cases2 Plurals?
PossessivePrn?(1) Noun-Stems PossessivePrn?(2) Nominalizer? ToBeSuff

PATTERN Verbs
( (Adverbs [ +:> ] )? SubjPersonNumber(1) SubjPersonNumber(4) Negation?(1) Verb-Stems Negation?(2) Reflexivity&Port? Tense SubjPersonNumber(5) SubjPersonNumber(2) ObjSlot SubjPersonNumber(6) NegationSuff? SubjPersonNumber(7) ObjNumber SubjPersonNumber(8) SubjPersonNumber(3) NegationSuff2? Mode? Aspect Clitic? Nominalizer? Subord? ( [ +:> ] Adverbs)? )[^[past,nonpast],^[ssg1,ssg23],^[noport,bigport]]
( (Adverbs [ +:> ] )? SubjPersonNumber(1) SubjPersonNumber(4)? Negation?(1) Verb-Stems Negation?(2) Reflexivity&Port? Tense SubjPersonNumber(5)? SubjPersonNumber(2) ObjSlot SubjPersonNumber(6)? NegationSuff? SubjPersonNumber(7)? ObjNumber SubjPersonNumber(8)? SubjPersonNumber(3) NegationSuff2? Mode? Aspect Clitic? Nominalizer? Subord? ( [ +:> ] Adverbs)? )[^[past,nonpast],^[ssg1,ssg23],^[noport,bigport]]  # Dir/LR
Voice?(1) Negation?(1) Verb-Stems GerundMarker Negation?(2) Voice?(2) Cases? Subord? Concession? ( [ +:> ] Adverbs)?
Verb-Stems GerundMarker Imperious ( [ +:> ] Adverbs)?
Verb-Stems Nominalizer Cases? Subord
Verb-Stems Nominalizer Cases? Concession
Voice(1) Verb-Stems Voice(2) Voice(3)
Voice(1) Verb-Stems Voice(2) Voice(3) Cases? Subord
Voice(1) Verb-Stems Voice(2) Voice(3) Cases? Concession
Voice(1) Verb-Stems Voice(2) Voice(3) Cases Cases2
Verb-Stems GerundMarker ObjNumber|Reflexivity&Port ( [ +:> ] Adverbs)?
Verb-Stems Verb2 Concession
Verb-Stems GerundMarker Comparative
Verb-Stems ToBeSuff
(Conjunctions [ +:> ] ) Verb-Stems ObjSlot Cases
(DemonstrativePrns [ +:> ] ) Verb-Stems Tense SubjPersonNumber(2) ObjSlot ObjNumber Ergation

LEXICON PossessiveSuff
<pos>:>{gs}{i}{N}

LEXICON PossessivePrn(2)
:ᤀᤠ>               <px1sg>:
:ᤀᤠᤴᤆᤡ>         <px1duincl>:
:ᤀᤠᤴᤆᤡᤅᤠ>       <px1duexcl>:
:ᤀᤠᤏᤡ>          <px1plincl>:
:ᤀᤠᤏᤡᤅᤠ>        <px1plexcl>:
:ᤁᤠ>              <px2sg>:    # Dir/LR
:{K}{E}>         <px2sg>:
:ᤂᤧᤴᤆᤡ>            <px2du>:
:ᤂᤧᤏᤡ>             <px2pl>:
:ᤁᤢ>              <px3sg>:
:ᤂᤢᤴᤆᤡ>            <px3du>:
:ᤂᤢᤴᤆᤡ>            <px3pl>:

LEXICON ToBeSuff
<ser1sg>:>{gs}{Ee}
<ser1duincl>:>ᤛᤡ
<ser1plincl>:>ᤛᤡ
<ser1duexcl>:>ᤛᤡ>ᤃᤧ
<ser1plexcl>:>ᤛᤡ>ᤃᤧ
<ser2sg>:>ᤏᤧ
<ser2du>:>ᤏᤧᤆᤡ{ng}
<ser2du>:>ᤏᤧᤇᤡ{ng}
<ser2du>:>ᤏᤧᤳᤇᤡ      # Dir/LR
<ser2pl>:>ᤏᤡ{ng}
<ser3sg>:
<ser3du>:>ᤛᤡ
<ser3pl>:>ᤛᤡ

LEXICON Voice(3)
:{K}{E}>      <act>:        <nom>:>{Bb}{A}

LEXICON SubjPersonNumber(8)
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg1,noport]           <s_sg1>:[ssg1,noport]           <incl>:[ssg1,noport]            :[ssg1,noport]                :[ssg1,noport]           :>{ng}[ssg1,noport]         :[ssg1,noport]              :>{ng}[ssg1,noport]
:[ssg1,noport]             <s_sg1>:[ssg1,noport]           <incl>:[ssg1,noport]            :[ssg1,noport]                :[ssg1,noport]           :>{ng}[ssg1,noport]         :[ssg1,noport]              :>{ng}[ssg1,noport]
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg1,noport]           <s_sg1>:[ssg1,noport]           <excl>:>ᤃᤧ[ssg1,noport]          :[ssg1,noport]                :[ssg1,noport]           :>{ng}[ssg1,noport]         :[ssg1,noport]              :>{ng}[ssg1,noport]
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg23,noport]          <s_du1>:[ssg23,noport]          <incl>:[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤛ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]                 # Dir/LR
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg23,noport]          <s_du1>:[ssg23,noport]          <excl>:>ᤃᤧ[ssg23,noport]         :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤛ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]                 # Dir/LR
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg23,noport]          <s_du1>:[ssg23,noport]          <incl>:[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤇ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg23,noport]          <s_du1>:[ssg23,noport]          <excl>:>ᤃᤧ[ssg23,noport]         :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤇ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_du1>:[ssg23,noport]          <incl>:[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤛ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]                 # Dir/LR
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_du1>:[ssg23,noport]          <incl>:[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤇ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg23,noport]          <s_pl1>:[ssg23,noport]          <incl>:[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]
:ᤀᤠ>[ssg23,noport]          <s_pl1>:[ssg23,noport]          <excl>:>ᤃᤧ[ssg23,noport]         :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_pl1>:[ssg23,noport]          <excl>:>ᤃᤧ[ssg23,noport]         :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,bigport]           <s_pl1>:[ssg23,bigport]         <excl>:>[ssg23,bigport]         :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,bigport]         :[ssg23,bigport]         :[ssg23,bigport]            :>{m}[ssg23,bigport]        :>{m}[ssg23,bigport]             # Dir/LR
:ᤀᤠ>[past,ssg23,noport]     <s_pl1>:[past,ssg23,noport]     <excl>:>ᤃᤧ[past,ssg23,noport]    :ᤔ{E}>[past,ssg23,noport]     :[past,ssg23,noport]     :[past,ssg23,noport]        :>ᤔᤏᤠ[past,ssg23,noport]     :[past,ssg23,noport]
:ᤀᤠ>[past,ssg23,bigport]    <s_pl1>:[past,ssg23,bigport]    <excl>:>[past,ssg23,bigport]    :ᤔ{E}>[past,ssg23,bigport]    :[past,ssg23,bigport]    :[past,ssg23,bigport]       :>ᤔᤏᤠ[past,ssg23,bigport]    :[past,ssg23,bigport]            # Dir/LR
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_pl1>:[ssg23,noport]          <incl>:[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]
:{K}{E}>[ssg23,noport]     <s_sg2>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]         :[ssg23,noport]             :[ssg23,noport]              :[ssg23,noport]
:{K}{E}>[ssg23,noport]     <s_du2>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤛ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]                  # Dir/LR
:{K}{E}>[ssg23,noport]     <s_du2>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤇ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]
:{K}{E}>[ssg23,noport]     <s_pl2>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_pl2>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_sg3>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]               :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :[ssg23,noport]             :[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_du3>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤛ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]                  # Dir/LR
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_du3>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :>ᤇ[ssg23,noport]        :[ssg23,noport]             :>ᤇᤡ[ssg23,noport]           :[ssg23,noport]
:[ssg23,noport]            <s_pl3>:[ssg23,noport]                :[ssg23,noport]           :ᤔ{E}>[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]          :[ssg23,noport]             :>{m}[ssg23,noport]         :>{m}[ssg23,noport]

LEXICON Negation(2)
:ᤔᤧ>       <neg>:       # Dir/LR
:ᤔᤧ{N}>    <neg>:
:ᤏ>       <neg>:

LEXICON GerundMarker
<ger>:>ᤔᤢᤏᤠ
<inf>:>ᤔᤧ    # Dir/LR
<inf>:>ᤔᤠ

LEXICON Reflexivity&Port
<refl>:>ᤛᤡ{ng}
<refl>:>ᤏᤧ                # Dir/LR
<o_2>:>ᤏᤧ

LEXICON Tense
<nonpast>:[nonpast]
<past>:>{E}[past]
<past>:>{a}{E}[past]     # Dir/LR

LEXICON ObjSlot
<o_3>:>{a}{u}[noport]
<o_3>:>{u}[noport]       # Dir/LR
<os_pl>:>{a}{I}[noport]
<os_pl>:>{I}[noport]     # Dir/LR
<os_du>:>ᤛᤡ[noport]       # Dir/LR
<os_du>:>ᤇᤡ[noport]
<os_sg>:[noport]

<os_sg12>:>ᤧ[nonpast,noport]
<o_3>:>ᤧ[nonpast,ssg1,noport]
<os_sg12>:>{a}{A}{ng}[past,noport]
<os_sg12>:>{A}{ng}[past,noport]       # Dir/LR
<o_3>:>ᤐᤠ{ng}[past,ssg1,noport]
<​o_3>:>{a}{u}{m}ᤛᤡᤶᤒᤧ[bigport]
<​o_3>:>{u}{m}ᤛᤡᤶᤒᤧ[bigport]            # Dir/LR

LEXICON NegationSuff
<neg>:>{N}

LEXICON Mode
<opt>:>ᤖ
<opt>:>ᤗ   # Dir/LR
<cni>:>ᤔᤧ{N}
<irr>:>ᤃᤏᤡ

LEXICON Aspect
<impf>:>{B}{A}
<perf>:

LEXICON Clitic
<clt><ass>:>ᤖᤥ
<clt><ass>:>ᤗᤥ   # Dir/LR
<clt><depr>:>ᤗᤇ  # Dir/LR
<clt><depr>:>ᤖᤇ

LEXICON ObjNumber
<o_nonsg>:>ᤛᤡ[noport]
<o_nonsg>:[bigport]      # Dir/LR
<o_sg>:[noport]

LEXICON NegationSuff2
<neg>:>{N}
<neg>:>ᤏᤧ{N} # Dir/LR

LEXICON Plurals
<sg>:
<pl>:>ᤄᤠ
<pl>:>ᤜᤠ᤹ # Dir/LR
<du>:>ᤄᤠᤇᤡ
<du>:>ᤜᤠ᤹ᤇᤡ # Dir/LR
